Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.090

Administration of fiduciary powers.

(1)(a) The board of directors is responsible for the proper exercise of fiduciary powers by the trust company. All matters pertinent thereto, including the determination of policies, the investment and disposition of property held in a fiduciary capacity, and the direction and review of the actions of all officers, employees, and committees utilized by the trust company in the exercise of its fiduciary powers, are the responsibility of the board. In discharging this responsibility, the board of directors may assign, by action duly entered in the minutes, the administration of such of the trust company's fiduciary powers as it may consider proper to assign to such directors, officers, employees, or committees as it may designate.

(b) A fiduciary account may not be accepted without the prior approval of the board, or of the directors, officers, or committees to whom the board may have designated the performance of that responsibility.

(c) A written record shall be made of such acceptances and of the relinquishment or closing out of all fiduciary accounts. Upon the acceptance of an account for which the trust company has investment responsibilities a prompt review of the assets shall be made. The board shall also ensure that at least once during every calendar year thereafter, all the assets held in or for each fiduciary account where the bank has investment responsibilities are reviewed to determine the advisability of retaining or disposing of such assets.

(2) All officers and employees taking part in the operation of the state trust institution shall be adequately bonded.

(3) Every qualified fiduciary subject to this section and exercising fiduciary powers in Washington state shall designate, employ, or retain legal counsel who shall be readily available to pass upon fiduciary matters and to advise the trust company and its state trust institution.

(4)(a) The state trust institution may utilize personnel and facilities of other departments of the trust company or its affiliates, and other departments of the trust company may utilize the personnel and facilities of the state trust institution or its affiliates only to the extent not prohibited by law and as long as the separate identity of the state trust institution is preserved.

(b) Pursuant to a written agreement, a trust company exercising fiduciary powers may perform services related to the exercise of fiduciary powers for another trust company or other entity, and may purchase services related to the exercise of fiduciary powers from another trust company or other entity.

(5) Fiduciary records shall be kept separate and distinct from other records of the trust company and maintained in compliance with RCW 30B.04.130. All fiduciary records shall be kept and retained for such time as to enable the fiduciary to furnish such information or reports with respect thereto as may be required by the director.

(6) Every such fiduciary shall keep an adequate record of all pending litigation to which it is a party in connection with its exercise of fiduciary powers.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a state trust company and its directors, officers, managers, employees, and committees shall exercise administration of fiduciary powers consistent with the requirements of RCW 30B.24.030 and in conformity with the contents of the state trust company's written statement of principles of trust management, pursuant to RCW 30B.24.040, as adopted by the board and subject to approval of the department.

[ 2019 c 389 s 37; 2014 c 37 s 355.]